Hawaii statutes.
[§457-12.5] Discipline based on
action taken in another state; conditions; prohibition on practice. (a)
Upon receipt of evidence of revocation, suspension, or other disciplinary
action against a licensee in another state, the board may issue an order imposing
disciplinary action upon the licensee on the following conditions:

(1) The board shall serve the licensee with a
proposed order imposing disciplinary action as required by chapter 91;

(2) The licensee shall have the right to request a
hearing pursuant to chapter 91 to show cause why the action described in the
proposed order should not be imposed;

(3) Any request for a hearing shall be made in
writing and filed with the board within twenty days after mailing of the
proposed order to the licensee; and

(4) If the licensee does not submit a written request
for a hearing within twenty days after mailing of the proposed order, the board
shall issue a final order imposing the disciplinary action described in the
proposed order.

(b) A certified copy of the disciplinary
action in another state shall constitute prima facie evidence of the
disciplinary action.

(c) A licensee against whom the board has
issued a proposed order under this section shall be prohibited from practicing
in this State until the board issues a final order if:

(1) The licensee was the subject of disciplinary
action in another state; and

(2) The disciplinary action in the other state
prohibits the licensee from practicing in that state.

(d) In addition to the provisions of this section,
the board may take any other action authorized by this chapter or chapter 436B.

(e) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
the final order of discipline taken pursuant to this section shall be a matter
of public record. [L 2016, c 38, §4]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next